test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_soddadem_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - šoddâdem:
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Nom: šoddâdem
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Gen: šoddâdem
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Acc: šoddâdem
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Ill: šoddâdmân
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Loc: šoddâdmist
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Com: šoddâdmáin
    šoddâdem+N+Sg+Abe: šoddâdemttáá
    šoddâdem+N+Ess: šoddâdmin
    šoddâdem+N+Par: šoddâdmid
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Nom: šoddâdmeh
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Gen: šoddâdmij
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Acc: šoddâdmijd
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Ill: šoddâdmáid
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Loc: šoddâdmijn
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Com: [šoddâdmijguin, šoddâdmijgijn]
    šoddâdem+N+Pl+Abe: šoddâdmijttáá

  Noun - peividem:
    peividem+N+Sg+Nom: peividem
    peividem+N+Sg+Gen: peividem
    peividem+N+Sg+Acc: peividem
    peividem+N+Sg+Ill: peividmân
    peividem+N+Sg+Loc: peividmist
    peividem+N+Sg+Com: peividmáin
    peividem+N+Sg+Abe: peividemttáá
    peividem+N+Ess: peividmin
    peividem+N+Par: peividmid
    peividem+N+Pl+Nom: peividmeh
    peividem+N+Pl+Gen: peividmij
    peividem+N+Pl+Acc: peividmijd
    peividem+N+Pl+Ill: peividmáid
    peividem+N+Pl+Loc: peividmijn
    peividem+N+Pl+Com: [peividmijguin, peividmijgijn]
    peividem+N+Pl+Abe: peividmijttáá
